District of Columbia statutes.
20-742

Court order.

A personal representative may at any time petition the Court for permission to act in any matter relating to the administration of the estate.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Apr. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 3, 41 DCR 1023
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 31, 42 DCR 63
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.
1981 Ed., § 20-742.